test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NAD_C_zhagay_gt-norm.yaml
     zhagay+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: zhagayenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: zhagayensishinaaniban
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: zhagayensishinaan***idig, idog***
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: zhagayensishiniiban
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: zhagayensishini***idig, idog***
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: zhagayensishiwaaiban
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: zhagayensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     zhagay+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: zhagayenhishinaaning
     zhagay+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: zhagayenhishinaanan
     zhagay+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: zhagayenhishinaanag
     zhagay+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: zhagayenhishiniing
     zhagay+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: zhagayenhishinian
     zhagay+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: zhagayenhishiniag
     zhagay+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: zhagayenhishiwaaing
     zhagay+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: zhagayenhishiwaaan
     zhagay+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: zhagayenhishiwaaag
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: zhagayensishinaaning
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: zhagayensishinaanan
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: zhagayensishinaanag
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: zhagayensishiniing
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: zhagayensishinian
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: zhagayensishiniag
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: zhagayensishiwaaing
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: zhagayensishiwaaan
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: zhagayensishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     zhagay+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: zhagayenhishibaning
     zhagay+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: zhagayenhishibanan
     zhagay+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: zhagayenhishibanag
     zhagay+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: zhagayenhish***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: zhagayenhish***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: zhagayenhish***idig, idog***ag
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: zhagayensishibaning
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: zhagayensishibanan
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: zhagayensishibanag
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: zhagayensish***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: zhagayensish***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: zhagayensish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     zhagay+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: zhagayenhinaanibaning
     zhagay+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: zhagayenhinaanibanan
     zhagay+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: zhagayenhinaanibanag
     zhagay+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: zhagayenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: zhagayenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: zhagayenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     zhagay+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: zhagayenhiniibaning
     zhagay+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: zhagayenhiniibanan
     zhagay+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: zhagayenhiniibanag
     zhagay+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: zhagayenhini***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: zhagayenhini***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: zhagayenhini***idig, idog***ag
     zhagay+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: zhagayenhiwaaibaning
     zhagay+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: zhagayenhiwaaibanan
     zhagay+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: zhagayenhiwaaibanag
     zhagay+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: zhagayenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: zhagayenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: zhagayenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     zhagay+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: zhagayensinaanibaning
     zhagay+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: zhagayensinaanibanan
     zhagay+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: zhagayensinaanibanag
     zhagay+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: zhagayensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: zhagayensinaan***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: zhagayensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     zhagay+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: zhagayensiniibaning
     zhagay+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: zhagayensiniibanan
     zhagay+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: zhagayensiniibanag
     zhagay+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: zhagayensini***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: zhagayensini***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: zhagayensini***idig, idog***ag
     zhagay+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: zhagayensiwaaibaning
     zhagay+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: zhagayensiwaaibanan
     zhagay+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: zhagayensiwaaibanag
     zhagay+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: zhagayensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: zhagayensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: zhagayensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: zhagayimishinaaniban
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: zhagayimishinaan***idig, idog***
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: zhagayimishiniiban
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: zhagayimishini***idig, idog***
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: zhagayimishiwaaiban
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: zhagayimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: zhagayimishinaaning
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: zhagayimishinaanan
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: zhagayimishinaanag
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: zhagayimishiniing
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: zhagayimishinian
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: zhagayimishiniag
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: zhagayimishiwaaing
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: zhagayimishiwaaan
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: zhagayimishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: zhagayimishibaning
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: zhagayimishibanan
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: zhagayimishibanag
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: zhagayimish***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: zhagayimish***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: zhagayimish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: zhagayiminaanibaning
     zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: zhagayiminaanibanan
     zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: zhagayiminaanibanag
     zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: zhagayiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: zhagayiminaan***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: zhagayiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     zhagay+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: zhagayiminiibaning
     zhagay+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: zhagayiminiibanan
     zhagay+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: zhagayiminiibanag
     zhagay+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: zhagayimini***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: zhagayimini***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: zhagayimini***idig, idog***ag
     zhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: zhagayimiwaaibaning
     zhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: zhagayimiwaaibanan
     zhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: zhagayimiwaaibanag
     zhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: zhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: zhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: zhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: zhagayishinaanibaning
     zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: zhagayishinaanibanan
     zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: zhagayishinaanibanag
     zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: zhagayishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: zhagayishinaan***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: zhagayishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     zhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: zhagayishiniibaning
     zhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: zhagayishiniibanan
     zhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: zhagayishiniibanag
     zhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: zhagayishini***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: zhagayishini***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: zhagayishini***idig, idog***ag
     zhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: zhagayishiwaaibaning
     zhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: zhagayishiwaaibanan
     zhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: zhagayishiwaaibanag
     zhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: zhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: zhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: zhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nizhagayenhimishinaan
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nizhagayenhimishini
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nizhagayenhimishiwaa
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nizhagayensimishinaan
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nizhagayensimishini
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nizhagayensimishiwaa
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gizhagayenhimishinaan
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gizhagayenhimishini
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gizhagayenhimishiwaa
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gizhagayensimishinaan
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gizhagayensimishini
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gizhagayensimishiwaa
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: ozhagayenhimishinaan
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: ozhagayenhimishini
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: ozhagayenhimishiwaa
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: ozhagayensimishinaan
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: ozhagayensimishini
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: ozhagayensimishiwaa
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: izhagayenhimishinaan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: izhagayenhimishini
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: izhagayenhimishiwaa
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: izhagayensimishinaan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: izhagayensimishini
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: izhagayensimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: nizhagayenhimishiban
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: nizhagayenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: nizhagayensimishiban
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: nizhagayensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: gizhagayenhimishiban
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: gizhagayenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: gizhagayensimishiban
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: gizhagayensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: ozhagayenhimishiban
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: ozhagayenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: ozhagayensimishiban
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: ozhagayensimish***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: izhagayenhimishiban
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: izhagayenhimish***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: izhagayensimishiban
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: izhagayensimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: nizhagayenhimishing
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: nizhagayenhimishan
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: nizhagayenhimishag
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: nizhagayensimishing
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: nizhagayensimishan
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: nizhagayensimishag
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: gizhagayenhimishing
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: gizhagayenhimishan
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: gizhagayenhimishag
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: gizhagayensimishing
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: gizhagayensimishan
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: gizhagayensimishag
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: ozhagayenhimishing
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: ozhagayenhimishan
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: ozhagayenhimishag
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: ozhagayensimishing
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: ozhagayensimishan
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: ozhagayensimishag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: izhagayenhimishing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: izhagayenhimishan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: izhagayenhimishag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: izhagayensimishing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: izhagayensimishan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: izhagayensimishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: nizhagayenhiminaaniban
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nizhagayenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: nizhagayenhiminiiban
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: nizhagayenhimini***idig, idog***
     +Px1zhagay+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: nizhagayenhimiwaaiban
